Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 471.6161, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin School districts and charter schools; reports. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, an entity offering or providing group health insurance includes both health plan companies and third-party administrators of health plans. new text end new text begin (b) By July 1 of each year, the Legislative Budget Office must send an annual survey regarding health insurance costs to all school districts and charter schools. The school district or charter school must return the survey to the Legislative Budget Office by September 1 each year. new text end new text begin (c) The annual survey must be completed by the school district or charter school using data from the most recent fiscal year and must provide: new text end new text begin (1) the total number of employees; new text end new text begin (2) for individuals participating in the group health insurance offered by the school district or charter school, the total number of people in each of the following categories: new text end new text begin (i) salaried employees; new text end new text begin (ii) nonsalaried or hourly employees; and new text end new text begin (iii) retirees and other persons who continue to receive coverage through the school district's or charter school's health plan after separation from employment; new text end new text begin (3) the total number of employees who do not participate in the health plan; new text end new text begin (4) the total number of insured persons covered by the health plan; new text end new text begin (5) the total dollar amount the school district or charter school paid in health insurance premiums on behalf of all employees, excluding employee contributions transmitted to an entity providing group health insurance coverage or payments made on behalf of former employees; new text end new text begin (6) if a school district or charter school funds an individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement, the total amount contributed by the school district or charter school; new text end new text begin (7) the total amount employees paid in health insurance premiums; new text end new text begin (8) an accounting of all forms of direct or indirect compensation, including but not limited to fees, commissions, incentives, or rewards of any kind paid to a broker or agent, regardless of whether the compensation was (1) billed as a flat fee or percentage of premium, and (2) paid directly by the school district or charter school or through the entity offering group health insurance; new text end new text begin (9) the name of any entity providing group health insurance the school district or charter school has contracted with and the contract's expiration date; new text end new text begin (10) for each type of health plan offered to employees of a school district or charter school: new text end new text begin (i) the name of the plan and the plan's actuarial value, using the minimum value calculator information required in bid proposals under section 471.6161, subdivision 8, paragraph (d), clause (2), and described in the Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 156.145. The plan data must delineate amounts for single, family, and two-party plans, if offered; new text end new text begin (ii) the monthly contribution by the school district or charter school for each employee group per plan, including contributions to individual coverage health reimbursement arrangements; new text end new text begin (iii) the amount per month an employee must pay in health insurance premiums for the plan; and new text end new text begin (iv) the plan design for each type of plan, including: new text end new text begin (A) in-network deductibles; new text end new text begin (B) in-network out-of-pocket limits; new text end new text begin (C) out-of-network limits; new text end new text begin (D) co-payment; new text end new text begin (E) the employee's share of coinsurance; and new text end new text begin (F) the prescription annual out-of-pocket maximum, if separate from subitem (B); new text end new text begin (11) the dollar or percentage cost for all prescription levels, commonly generic or tier 1, formulary or tier 2, and nonformulary or tier 3; new text end new text begin (12) the total amount of annual contributions the school district or charter school pays on a per-employee basis to an individual coverage health reimbursement arrangement or health savings account, excluding amounts contributed solely to a health care retirement account; and new text end new text begin (13) the total amount assessed by the entity providing group health insurance as an administrative fee and the rate of the assessed fee. new text end new text begin (d) The Legislative Budget Office must compile information from the surveys collected under this subdivision and provide a report by December 1 each year to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over education and health insurance. The Legislative Budget Office must post the report, including the executive summary and all underlying data received from school districts and charter schools, on the Legislative Budget Office's public website. Data posted on the Legislative Budget Office's website must be in a standardized format. new text end new text begin (e) If a school district or charter school fails to complete the annual survey and provide the information required under paragraph (c), the Legislative Budget Office or any other person may bring an action under section 13.08, subdivision 4, or 13.085, against the school district or charter school to compel compliance with this subdivision. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Legislative Budget Office to complete the annual report required by section 1. The base for this appropriation is $....... in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. new text end